Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-624
Society names and emblems; registration; organizations not affected.

The provisions of sections 21-617 to 21-623 shall not apply to or in any way affect any fraternal society, club, organization, or association connected with and recognized by any university, college, parochial school, high school, or other educational institution in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 8, p. 498;

C.S.1929, § 24-621;

R.S.1943, § 21-624;

Laws 1987, LB 31, § 1.